Illinois, session 104th, HB1408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 26-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/26-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 26-1)7    Sec. 26-1. Disorderly conduct. 8    (a) A person commits disorderly conduct when he or she 9knowingly:10        (1) Does any act in such unreasonable manner as to 11    alarm or disturb another and to provoke a breach of the 12    peace;13        (2) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 14    manner to the fire department of any city, town, village 15    or fire protection district a false alarm of fire, knowing 16    at the time of the transmission that there is no 17    reasonable ground for believing that the fire exists;18        (3) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 19    manner to another a false alarm to the effect that a bomb 20    or other explosive of any nature or a container holding 21    poison gas, a deadly biological or chemical contaminant, 22    or radioactive substance is concealed in a place where its 23    explosion or release would endanger human life, knowing at   HB1408- 2 -LRB104 03238 RLC 13260 b1    the time of the transmission that there is no reasonable 2    ground for believing that the bomb, explosive or a 3    container holding poison gas, a deadly biological or 4    chemical contaminant, or radioactive substance is 5    concealed in the place;6        (3.5) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 7    manner a threat of destruction of a school building or 8    school property, or a threat of violence, death, or bodily 9    harm directed against persons at a school, school 10    function, or school event, whether or not school is in 11    session; 12        (4) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 13    manner to any peace officer, public officer or public 14    employee a report to the effect that an offense will be 15    committed, is being committed, or has been committed, 16    knowing at the time of the transmission that there is no 17    reasonable ground for believing that the offense will be 18    committed, is being committed, or has been committed;19        (5) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 20    manner a false report to any public safety agency without 21    the reasonable grounds necessary to believe that 22    transmitting the report is necessary for the safety and 23    welfare of the public;24        (6) Calls or texts the number "911" or transmits or 25    causes to be transmitted in any manner to a public safety 26    agency or public safety answering point for the purpose of   HB1408- 3 -LRB104 03238 RLC 13260 b1    making or transmitting a false alarm or complaint and 2    reporting information when, at the time the call, text, or 3    transmission is made, the person knows there is no 4    reasonable ground for making the call, text, or 5    transmission and further knows that the call, text, or 6    transmission could result in the emergency response of any 7    public safety agency;8        (7) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 9    manner a false report to the Department of Children and 10    Family Services under Section 4 of the Abused and 11    Neglected Child Reporting Act;12        (8) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 13    manner a false report to the Department of Public Health 14    under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental 15    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 16    Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;17        (9) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 18    manner to the police department or fire department of any 19    municipality or fire protection district, or any privately 20    owned and operated ambulance service, a false request for 21    an ambulance, emergency medical technician-ambulance or 22    emergency medical technician-paramedic knowing at the time 23    there is no reasonable ground for believing that the 24    assistance is required;25        (10) Transmits or causes to be transmitted in any 26    manner a false report under Article II of Public Act   HB1408- 4 -LRB104 03238 RLC 13260 b1    83-1432;2        (11) Enters upon the property of another and for a 3    lewd or unlawful purpose deliberately looks into a 4    dwelling on the property through any window or other 5    opening in it; or6        (12) While acting as a collection agency as defined in 7    the Collection Agency Act or as an employee of the 8    collection agency, and while attempting to collect an 9    alleged debt, makes a telephone call to the alleged debtor 10    which is designed to harass, annoy or intimidate the 11    alleged debtor.12    (b) Sentence. A violation of subsection (a)(1) of this 13Section is a Class C misdemeanor. A violation of subsection 14(a)(1) of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor if the 15violation results or requires a business or facility to close 16during the breach of the peace. A violation of subsection 17(a)(5) or (a)(11) of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor. A 18violation of subsection (a)(8) or (a)(10) of this Section is a 19Class B misdemeanor. A violation of subsection (a)(2), 20(a)(3.5), (a)(4), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(9) of this Section is 21a Class 4 felony. A violation of subsection (a)(3) of this 22Section is a Class 3 felony, for which a fine of not less than 23$3,000 and no more than $10,000 shall be assessed in addition 24to any other penalty imposed.25    A violation of subsection (a)(12) of this Section is a 26Business Offense and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed   HB1408- 5 -LRB104 03238 RLC 13260 b1$3,000. A second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(7) 2or (a)(5) of this Section is a Class 4 felony. A third or 3subsequent violation of subsection (a)(11) of this Section is 4a Class 4 felony.5    (c) In addition to any other sentence that may be imposed, 6a court shall order any person convicted of disorderly conduct 7to perform community service for not less than 30 and not more 8than 120 hours, if community service is available in the 9jurisdiction and is funded and approved by the county board of 10the county where the offense was committed. In addition, 11whenever any person is placed on supervision for an alleged 12offense under this Section, the supervision shall be 13conditioned upon the performance of the community service.14    This subsection does not apply when the court imposes a 15sentence of incarceration.16    (d) In addition to any other sentence that may be imposed, 17the court shall order any person convicted of disorderly 18conduct under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) involving a 19false alarm of a threat that a bomb or explosive device has 20been placed in a school that requires an emergency response to 21reimburse the unit of government that employs the emergency 22response officer or officers that were dispatched to the 23school for the cost of the response. If the court determines 24that the person convicted of disorderly conduct that requires 25an emergency response to a school is indigent, the provisions 26of this subsection (d) do not apply.  HB1408- 6 -LRB104 03238 RLC 13260 b1    (e) In addition to any other sentence that may be imposed, 2the court shall order any person convicted of disorderly 3conduct under paragraph (3.5) or (6) of subsection (a) to 4reimburse the public agency for the reasonable costs of the 5emergency response by the public agency up to $10,000. If the 6court determines that the person convicted of disorderly 7conduct under paragraph (3.5) or (6) of subsection (a) is 8indigent, the provisions of this subsection (e) do not apply.9    (f) For the purposes of this Section, "emergency response" 10means any condition that results in, or could result in, the 11response of a public official in an authorized emergency 12vehicle, any condition that jeopardizes or could jeopardize 13public safety and results in, or could result in, the 14evacuation of any area, building, structure, vehicle, or of 15any other place that any person may enter, or any incident 16requiring a response by a police officer, a firefighter, a 17State Fire Marshal employee, or an ambulance. 18(Source: P.A. 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.)